sample.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +SG +PL +PP1 +PP2 +PP3 +NOM +ACC +GEN +DAT +LOC +ABL +PART +PSG

LEXICON Root
kitob    NumC;

LEXICON NumC
+SG:0   Poss1;
+PL:lar Poss2;

LEXICON NumV
+SG:0    Poss2;
+PL:lar  Poss2;

LEXICON Poss1
+PP1+PSG:m      Case;
+PP2+PSG:ng     Case;
+PP3+PSG:si     Case;
+PP1+PSG:miz    Case;
+PP2+PSG:ngiz   Case;
+PP3+PSG:i      Case;
                Case;

LEXICON Poss2
+PP1:PSG:im     Case;
+PP2+PSG:ing    Case;
+PP3+PSG:i      Case;
+PP1+PPL:imiz   Case;
+PP2+PPL:ingiz  Case;
+PP3+PPL:i      Case;
                Case;

LEXICON Case 
+NOM:0          PrePreFinal1;
+ACC:ning       Final;
+GEN:ni         PrePreFinal2;
+DAT:ga         PrePreFinal1;
+LOC:da         PrePreFinal2;
+ABL:dan        PrePreFinal1;

LEXICON PrePreFinal1
+PART:mi        Final;
+PART:ku        Final;
+PART:-ya       Final;
+PART:-da       Final;
+PART:-chi      Final;
                Final;


LEXICON PrePreFinal2 
+PART:mi        Final;
+PART:ku        Final;
+PART:-ya       Final;
+PART:-chi      Final;
                Final;

LEXICON Final 
                # ;
